Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2806
Hospital, defined.

Hospital shall mean a public or private institution licensed pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 73.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.